Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
236D

ESTATE AND
TRANSFER TAX

Section

236D-1 Short title

236D-2 Definitions

236D-2.3 Effect of civil union

236D-2.5 Taxation under chapter 236D; applicable
exclusion

amount

236D-3 Residents; tax imposed; credit for tax
paid other

state

236D-3.5 Generation-skipping transfers; tax
imposed; credit

for tax paid other state

236D-4 Nonresidents; tax imposed; exemption

236D-4.5 Nonresidents not citizens; tax imposed;
exemption

236D-5 Tax reports; date to be filed; extensions

236D-6 Date payment due; date deemed received

236D-7 Interest on amount due; extension of time
to file

federal return

236D-8 Department to issue release; final
settlement of

account

236D-9 Amended returns; final determination

236D-10 Administration; rules

236D-11 Sale of property to pay tax; creation of
lien

236D-12 Liability for failure to pay tax before
distribution

or delivery

236D-13 Refund for overpayment

236D-14 Repealed

236D-15 Administration by department; action for
collection

of tax; appeal

236D-16 Expenses of court proceeding

236D-17 Who liable, amount

236D-18 Disposition of revenues

Note

Chapter does not apply to decedents dying or taxable
transfers occurring after January 25, 2012. L 2012, c 220, §3.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next